Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.037

Variable contracts—Registration required—Rules.

As required by chapter 48.18A RCW, a person selling variable contracts shall be registered as a broker-dealer or securities salesperson as required by this chapter. This chapter, and any rules or orders adopted under this chapter, applies to any person engaged in the offer, sale, or purchase of a variable contract. "Variable contract" means the same as set forth under chapter 48.18A RCW.

[ 2002 c 65 s 8.]